California, session 20252026, AB892.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2129 is added to the Fish and Game Code, to read:2129. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Covered animal” means any live member of any of the following animals held in captivity:(A) Bear.(B) Elephant.(C) Nonhuman primate.(2) “Direct contact” means physical contact or proximity where physical contact is possible, including, but not limited to, any proximity without a permanent physical barrier designed to prevent physical contact between the public and a covered animal.(3) “Professional production crew” means a cast or crew member of a television or motion picture production team that has obtained all permits as required by law, and includes a professional photographer, videographer, or cinematographer.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a person shall not allow any member of the public to come into direct contact with a covered animal.(c) This section shall not apply to direct contact between a covered animal and any of the following individuals:(1) The owner of the covered animal.(2) The owner of the facility in which the covered animal is kept.(3) A trained, paid, professional employee or contractor of the owner of the covered animal or facility, including employees who care for or handle animals at a zoo, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 2150, or an accompanying paid employee receiving professional training, while acting in the course and scope of official duty.(4) A licensed veterinarian, a veterinary student accompanying a licensed veterinarian, a registered veterinary technician under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian, or any licensed medical professional assisting the veterinary team and under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian, while acting in the course and scope of official duty.(5) A law enforcement officer or animal control authority acting in the course and scope of official duty.(6) An employee of a federal, state, or local agency while acting in the course and scope of official duty.(7) A board member of the facility where the animal is kept who is listed on the facility’s statement of information, or a trainee, who meets all of the following conditions:(A) The person is accompanied by the facility’s owner or trained employee.(B) The person is performing work with the covered animal away from public view.(C) The person is under a contract or other engagement with the facility’s owner.(8) A professional production crew who is acting in the course and scope of a television or motion picture production.(d) A person who violates this section is subject to the civil penalty set forth in Section 2125 for each violation, and the restricted species permit for the covered animal is subject to immediate suspension or revocation by the department. A person whose restricted species permit is suspended or revoked pursuant to this section may appeal the suspension or revocation to the commission by filing a written request for an appeal with the commission within 30 days of the suspension or revocation. A person who violates this section shall not be subject to the criminal penalties set forth in this code.(e) This section shall not be construed to limit or prevent the commission from enacting rules or regulations that prohibit the direct contact with an animal that is not a covered animal.(f) The provisions of this section are in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other laws protecting animal welfare. This section shall not be construed to limit any state law or rules protecting the welfare of animals or to prevent a local governing body from adopting and enforcing its own animal welfare laws and regulations.SEC. 2. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SECTION 1.Section 2129 is added to the Fish and Game Code, to read:2129.(a)For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1)“Covered animal” means any live member of any of the following animals held in captivity:(A)Bear.(B)Caracal.(C)Elephant.(D)Kangaroo, or any hybrid of a kangaroo.(E)Nonhuman primate.(F)Otter.(G)Serval.(H)Sloth.(I)Wallaby, or any hybrid of a wallaby.(2)“Direct contact” means physical contact or proximity where physical contact is possible, including, but not limited to, any proximity without a permanent physical barrier designed to prevent physical contact between the public and a covered animal.(3)“Professional production crew” means a cast or crew member of a television or motion picture production team that has obtained all permits as required by law, and includes a professional photographer, videographer, or cinematographer.(b)Notwithstanding any other law, a person shall not allow any member of the public to come into direct contact with a covered animal.(c)This section shall not apply to direct contact between a covered animal and any of the following:(1)The owner of the covered animal.(2)The owner of the facility in which the covered animal is kept.(3)A trained, paid, professional employee or contractor of the owner of the covered animal or facility, or an accompanying paid employee receiving professional training, while acting in the course and scope of official duty.(4)A licensed veterinarian, a veterinary student accompanying that veterinarian, a registered veterinary technician under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian, or any licensed medical professional assisting the veterinary team and under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian, while acting in the course and scope of official duty.(5)A law enforcement officer or animal control authority acting in the course and scope of official duty.(6)An employee of a federal, state, or local agency, while acting in the course and scope of official duty.(7)A board member of the facility where the animal is kept who is listed on the facility’s statement of information, or a trainee, who meets all of the following conditions:(A)The person is accompanied by the facility’s owner or trained employee.(B)The person is performing work with the covered animal away from public view.(C)The person is under a contract or other engagement with the facility’s owner.(8)A professional production crew who is acting in the course and scope of a television or motion picture production.(d)This section shall not apply to direct contact that occurs at a facility that is accredited by the Association of Zoos and Aquariums.(e)Any person who violates this section is subject to the civil penalty set forth in Section 2125 for each violation, and any restricted species permit for the covered animal is subject to immediate suspension or revocation by the department. A person whose restricted species permit is suspended or revoked pursuant to this section may appeal the suspension or revocation to the commission by filing a written request for an appeal with the commission within 30 days of the suspension or revocation. A person who violates this section is not subject to the criminal penalties set forth in this code.(f)This section shall not be construed to limit or prevent the Fish and Game Commission from enacting rules or regulations that prohibit the direct contact with an animal that is not defined as a “covered animal” in this section.(g)The provisions of this section are in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other laws protecting animal welfare. This section shall not be construed to limit any state law or rules protecting the welfare of animals or to prevent a local governing body from adopting and enforcing its own animal welfare laws and regulations.SEC. 2.The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.